Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.030

Assistance of educational service district boards and superintendents—Scope.

The superintendent of public instruction, by rule or regulation, may require the assistance of educational service district boards and/or superintendents in the performance of any duty, authority, or power imposed upon or granted to the superintendent of public instruction by law or by the Constitution of the state of Washington, upon such terms and conditions as the superintendent of public instruction shall establish. Such authority to assist the superintendent of public instruction shall be limited to the service function of information collection and dissemination and the attestment to the accuracy and completeness of submitted information.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 46; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 29. Formerly RCW 28A.03.028.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.